Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-420
University of Nebraska Facilities Program; created; use of appropriations.

The University of Nebraska Facilities Program is created. All funds appropriated to the program by the Legislature shall be used exclusively for the projects listed in section 85-421 or for renewal, renovation, replacement, or repair projects authorized pursuant to section 85-421.

Laws 2006, LB 605, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB384, § 17.